Arkansas, session 2025, HB1738.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF ARKANSAS:

SECTION 1. Arkansas Code Title 26, Chapter 52, Subchapter 4, is
amended to add an additional section to read as follows:
26-52-457. Disabled veterans — Definition.
(a) As used in this section, "disabled veteran" means a person who
qualifies for a property tax exemption under § 26-3-306.
(b)(1) The gross receipts or gross proceeds from the sale of tangible
personal property, specified digital products, a digital code, or a service
to the following are exempt from the gross receipts tax levied by this
chapter and the compensating use tax levied by the Arkansas Compensating Tax
Act of 1949, § 26-53-101 et seq.:
(1) A disabled veteran; or
(2) A member of a disabled veteran's household who is authorized
to make purchases on behalf of and for the benefit of the disabled veteran in
the disabled veteran's absence.
*JLL292*
03/11/2025 8:38:12 AM JLL292

HB1738
(c) To qualify for the exemption under this section, a disabled
veteran shall submit to the Department of Finance and Administration a letter
from the United States Department of Veterans Affairs certifying that he or
she is a disabled veteran under § 26-3-306.
(d)(1) The maximum total amount of sales that qualify for an exemption
under this section is twenty-five thousand dollars ($25,000) per year for
each disabled veteran.
(2) The Department of Finance and Administration may request a
taxpayer claiming an exemption under this section to provide a statement
executed under oath that the total amount of sales subject to the exemption
provided under this section has not exceeded the limitation provided in
subdivision (d)(1) of this section.
(3) If a taxpayer claims an exemption under this section on a
sale that exceeds the limitation provided in subdivision (d)(1) of this
section, the amount claimed as exempt in excess of the limitation shall be
treated as a direct sales tax liability, and the Department of Finance and
Administration may recover the sales and use tax, including any applicable
penalties and interest, by the use of any method authorized by law.
(e) The Department of Finance and Administration shall issue an
exemption card to each disabled veteran who qualifies for an exemption card
under this section and each member of a disabled veteran's household who is
authorized to make purchases on behalf of and for the benefit of the disabled
veteran in the disabled veteran's absence.
(f) A person who claims an exemption under this section with a purpose
to defraud upon conviction is guilty of a Class C misdemeanor.
(g) The Department of Finance and Administration shall promulgate
rules to implement and administer this section.

SECTION 2. DO NOT CODIFY. EFFECTIVE DATE. Section 1 of this act is
effective on the first day of the calendar quarter following the effective
date of this act.





03/11/2025 8:38:12 AM JLL292